Washington statutes.
RCW 39.104.150

Administration by the department of revenue and the department of commerce—Adoption of rules.

The department of revenue and the department of commerce may adopt any rules under chapter 34.05 RCW that the departments consider necessary for the administration of this chapter.

[ 2016 c 207 s 3; 2009 c 270 s 804.]